District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.11

District contributions.

(a)

For each pay period in which an employee or annuitant is insured under a policy of insurance purchased under § 1-622.05, a sum computed at a rate determined by the Mayor shall be contributed from the appropriation or fund that is used to pay the employee or annuitant to the carrier of the plan that the employee or annuitant has selected. This sum shall not exceed one-half the amount that is withheld from the compensation of the employee or annuitant under § 1-622.10 for basic life insurance coverage.

(b)

The District’s contribution for annuitants shall be paid from the trust fund established in § 1-621.09.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2211
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079
Mar. 7, 2000, D.C. Law 13-54, § 2(b), 46 DCR 9915
1981 Ed., § 1-623.11.
D.C. Law 13-54 designated the existing text as subsec. (a), and added subsec. (b).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Annuitants’ Health and Life Insurance Employer Contribution Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 12-278, April 27, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4284).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Annuitants’ Health and Life Insurance Employer Contribution Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-617, January 22, 1999, 46 DCR 1335).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Annuitants’ Health and Life Insurance Employer Contribution Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-199, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the Annuitants’ Health and Life Insurance Employer Contribution Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-276, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2015).